Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.120

Contents and scope of recommended and final decision—Delivery of copies.

The recommended decision shall contain the text in full of any recommended agreement, order, or amendment, and may deny or approve the proposal in its entirety, or it may recommend a marketing agreement, order, or amendment containing other or different terms or conditions from those contained in the proposal: PROVIDED, That the same shall be of a kind or type substantially within the purview of the notice of hearing and shall be supported by evidence taken at the hearing or by documents of which the director is authorized to take official notice. The final decision shall set out in full the text of the agreement, order, or amendment covered thereby, and the director shall issue and deliver or mail copies of the final decision to all producers and handlers within the affected area who may be directly affected by such final decision and whose names and addresses appear, on the day next preceding the day on which such final decision is issued, upon the lists of such persons then on file in the department, and to all parties of record appearing at the hearing, or their attorneys of record. If the final decision denies the proposal in its entirety no further action shall be taken by the director.

[ 2002 c 313 s 10; 1985 c 261 s 3; 1961 c 256 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.